Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.697

Unclaimed liquidation dividends.

Any liquidation dividends to share account holders, depositors, or other creditors of the credit union remaining uncalled for and unpaid in the hands of the receiver for six months after the order of final distribution, must be deposited in a financial institution to each share account holder's, depositor's, or creditor's credit. The funds must be held in trust for the benefit of the persons entitled to the funds and, subject to the supervision of the court, must be paid by the receiver to them upon presentation of satisfactory evidence of their right to the funds.

[ 1997 c 397 s 78.]